src/fst/test/older-gt-norm-yamls/N-I-nipewikamikw-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - nipêwikamik - ok : # -m inanimate noun, Bedroom AEW NI3
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Sg: nipêwikamik
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: ninipêwikamik
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kinipêwikamik
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: ninipêwikamikonân
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px12Pl+Sg: kinipêwikamikonaw
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kinipêwikamikowâw
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: onipêwikamik
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg: onipêwikamikowâw
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px4Pl+Sg: onipêwikamikoyiw
              
     nipêwikamik+N+I: nipêwikamikwa
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: ninipêwikamikwa
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kinipêwikamikwa
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: ninipêwikamikonâna
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px12Pl+Pl: kinipêwikamikonawa
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kinipêwikamikowâwa
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: onipêwikamikwa
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl: onipêwikamikowâwa
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Px4Pl+Pl: onipêwikamikoyiwa
              
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Loc: nipêwikamikohk
     nipêwikamik+N+I+1Sg+Loc: ninipêwikamikohk
     nipêwikamik+N+I+2Sg+Loc: kinipêwikamikohk
     nipêwikamik+N+I+1Pl+Loc: ninipêwikamikonâhk
     nipêwikamik+N+I+12Pl+Loc: kinipêwikamikonâhk
     nipêwikamik+N+I+2Pl+Loc: kinipêwikamikowâhk
     nipêwikamik+N+I+3Sg+Loc: onipêwikamikohk
     nipêwikamik+N+I+3Pl+Loc: onipêwikamikowâhk
     nipêwikamik+N+I+4Pl+Loc: onipêwikamikoyihk
              
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [nipêwikamikos, nipêwikamikosis]
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl: [nipêwikamikosa, nipêwikamikosisa]
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Loc+Sg: [nipêwikamikosihk, nipêwikamikosisihk]
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: [ninipêwikamikos, ninipêwikamikosis]
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: [ninipêwikamikosa, ninipêwikamikosisa]
     nipêwikamik+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: [ninipêwikamikosihk, ninipêwikamikosisihk]
